District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.07

Control over park system not affected by this part.

Nothing contained in this part shall be construed to interfere with the exclusive charge and control prior to March 3, 1925, committed to the Director of the National Park Service over the park system of the District, and he or she is hereby authorized and empowered to make and enforce all regulations for the control of vehicles and traffic, and limiting the speed thereof on roads, highways, and bridges within the public grounds in the District, under his or her control, subject to the penalties prescribed in this part.

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1126, ch. 443, § 16(b)
July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 835, ch. 760, § 3
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 102(h), 59 DCR 12957
Parks and playgrounds, regulation of vehicles and traffic, see § 10-105.
1981 Ed., § 40-721.
1973 Ed., § 40-613.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 substituted “he and she” and “his or her” for “he” and “his,” respectively.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 102(h) of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 102(h) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 102(h) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 102(h) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
By Executive Order No. 6166, dated June 10, 1933, the Office of Public Buildings and Public Parks of the National Capital was changed to National Parks, Buildings, and Reservations. Act of March 2, 1934, 48 Stat. 389, ch. 38, § 1, abolished National Parks, Buildings, and Reservations and transferred its powers and duties to the National Park Service.